Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Tobacco Exhibition Center

248.500.
Establishment of Kentucky Tobacco Exhibition Center.

There shall be established the official Kentucky Tobacco Exhibition Center celebrating and documenting the contributions of tobacco to the history and economy of the Commonwealth and the role of Nelson County in tobacco’s growth, manufacturing, and sale in the state.

The Kentucky Tobacco Exhibition Center shall be located in Nelson County.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 399, §§ 1, 2, effective July 15, 1988.

248.510.
Tobacco research board membership — Compensation — Meetings — Quorum.

The Kentucky Tobacco Research Board is hereby created. The board shall be composed of thirteen (13) voting members and one (1) nonvoting member as follows:

Ten (10) permanent members who shall be the following officeholders or shall be designated by the following organizations: the Kentucky Farm Bureau Federation; the Kentucky Innovations Commission; the commissioner of the Kentucky Department of Agriculture; the dean of the University of Kentucky College of Agriculture; the Burley Growers Cooperative Association; the Council for Burley Tobacco; the Dark Fired Tobacco Association; the Kentucky Science and Technology Corporation; the chairman of the Senate Committee on Agriculture; and the chairman of the House Committee on Agriculture and Small Business. Each officeholder and organization shall designate an alternate who is authorized to serve when the member cannot be present at a meeting.

Three (3) members at large, at least one (1) of whom is a tobacco farmer in Kentucky and at least one (1) of whom has research and development experience in the public or private sector, who shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Legislative Research Commission.

One (1) nonvoting member from the University of Kentucky, who shall be the University of Kentucky Vice President for Research, or the Vice President’s designee. The nonvoting member of the board may be counted in determining a quorum, but the nonvoting member shall not vote on matters before the board.

No member of the board shall receive any salary, fee, or other remuneration for his services as a member of the board but each member shall be reimbursed for his ordinary travel expenses, including meals and lodging, incurred in the performance of his duties incident to implementation of the provisions of KRS

248.510

to

248.570

.

The term of the ten (10) members designated in paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section shall not change but they shall be permanent members in terms of the organizations and offices named. At-large members and the tobacco industry member shall serve two (2) year terms.

The board shall elect, by a majority vote of the thirteen (13) voting members, a chairman and a vice chair. The chairman shall be the presiding officer of the board, shall preside at all meetings, and coordinate the functions and activities of the board. The chairman shall be elected or reelected annually and shall be a permanent member or an at-large member of the board. The vice chair shall conduct meetings in the absence of the chairman. The board shall have such other organization as deemed necessary and approved by the board.

Meetings of the board shall be held at least quarterly but may be held more frequently as deemed necessary subject to call by the chairman or by request of a majority of the board members. Board meetings shall concern, among other things, policy matters relating to research projects and programs, research progress reports, authorization of projects and financial plans, and such other matters as necessary to carry out the intent of KRS

248.510

to

248.570

.

Seven (7) members of the board shall constitute a quorum for doing business. Each member shall have one (1) vote and a majority vote of the members present shall control on all questions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 255, § 1; 1972, ch. 212, § 1; 1982, ch. 324, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2002, ch. 98, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2009, ch. 32, § 2, effective June 25, 2009.

248.520.
Duties of board.

The Kentucky Tobacco Research Board shall:

Formulate policies and procedures as necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS

248.510

to

248.570

.

Promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS

248.510

to

248.570

and to ensure proper expenditure of state funds appropriated for the purposes of KRS

248.510

to

248.570

.

Review and authorize research projects and programs to be undertaken and financed under the provisions of KRS

248.510

to

248.570

.

The facilities designated the Tobacco and Health Research Institute before July 15, 2002, shall be retained and operated by the University of Kentucky exclusively for the program and activities described in KRS

248.580

.

In addition to the research and development funded by authority of the Kentucky Tobacco Research Board, the board is authorized to allow other research operations having related or complementary interests to share this physical facility with the Kentucky Tobacco Research and Development Center, subject to approval of the board.

Review and approve all progress and final research reports on projects authorized under the provisions of KRS

248.510

to

248.570

.

Ensure that state funds, appropriated by KRS

248.510

to

248.570

or any other act for tobacco research, are not diverted to any other use and that all authorized research projects are directed toward:

Preserving and strengthening tobacco agriculture in Kentucky;

Facilitating the progress of commercial endeavors in crop agriculture which have potential to provide entirely new market opportunities for tobacco growers; and

Applying, when appropriate, previously authorized research initially conducted with tobacco to other plants which might be grown commercially in Kentucky, thus obtaining the fullest possible practical benefit from the research progress.

Provide the Governor, the General Assembly, and the Legislative Research Commission an annual report by January 30 of each year showing the status of funds appropriated under KRS

248.510

to

248.570

for tobacco research and the progress of the board in terms of the results of its tobacco research efforts.

Advise the General Assembly by January 30 during each even-numbered-year regular session of the need for continuation of the Kentucky Tobacco Research Board and the tax levied by Chapter 255 of the Acts of 1970 for the purpose of financing tobacco and related new crops research programs as provided by KRS

248.510

to

248.570

.

Approve and release public statements relating to the progress and results of research projects.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 255, § 2; 1972, ch. 212, § 2; 2001, ch. 58, § 19, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 98, § 3, effective July 15, 2002.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The board, in its discretion, has the authority to employ full or part-time employees and consultants.

OAG 70-495

.

A small percentage of the research of the tobacco and health research institute could be subcontracted.

OAG 70-659

.

Some of the research may be done at a physical location other than the campus of the University of Kentucky.

OAG 70-659

.

The Kentucky tobacco research board could not move a portion of, or all of, the research work to Spindletop.

OAG 70-659

.

The provision of subsection (5) of this section charges the Kentucky tobacco research board with the duty of making certain that title to all research equipment remains in the Commonwealth, although certain research projects may now be conducted in places other than the University of Kentucky Tobacco and Health Research Institute.

OAG 72-547

.

The board’s action in extending the terms of its officers and at large members pending appointments by the Governor under the 1982 amendment to KRS

248.510

was a prudent way of ensuring the stability and continuity of the tobacco research program and was thus consistent with the board’s legislative charge.

OAG 82-330

.

248.530.
Technical adviser. [Repealed.]

248.540.
Tobacco research-trust fund.

The tax revenues received from the additional one-half cent ($0.005) tax levied by Chapter 255 of the Acts of 1970 shall be credited to a tobacco research-trust fund which is hereby created.

Federal funds which may be made available to supplement or match state funds for research programs provided for by KRS

248.510

to

248.570

shall be credited to the trust fund created in subsection (1) of this section.

Funds deposited to the credit of the tobacco research-trust fund shall be used to finance the research programs authorized under the provisions of KRS

248.510

to

248.570

and for no other purpose.

Funds unexpended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year or biennium, provided, however, that such surplus shall be included in the budget considered and approved by the board for the ensuing period.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 255, § 6; 2002, ch. 98, § 4, effective July 15, 2002.

248.550.
Appropriation and use of funds — Revenue estimates to be supplied by Office of State Budget Director.

The amount of revenues collected and/or credited to the tobacco research-trust fund shall be appropriated each year to the Kentucky Tobacco Research and Development Center to finance research projects and programs as provided in KRS

248.510

to

248.570

and shall be expended by the institute only on those projects and programs authorized by the Kentucky Tobacco Research Board.

The Office of State Budget Director shall supply revenue estimates of the amount of revenue anticipated to be collected during each fiscal year by the added one-half cent ($0.005) tax on cigarettes which estimate, along with any federal funds available, shall be the basis for preparing tobacco research programs and budget requests for each fiscal year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 255, § 7; 1988, ch. 273, § 12, effective July 15, 1988; 2000, ch. 46, § 28, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 98, § 5, effective July 15, 2002.

248.560.
Proposed research program — Budget.

The Kentucky Tobacco Research and Development Center shall prepare a proposed research program and budget request for each fiscal year and shall present such documents to the Kentucky Tobacco Research Board for consideration and approval. The budget shall be based on revenue estimates as provided in KRS

248.550

.

The budget shall provide for payment of expenses incurred by Kentucky Tobacco Research Board members as provided in subsection (2) of KRS

248.510

, and for other administrative costs of the board.

The Kentucky Tobacco Research Board shall consider the university recommendations and shall approve a budget for each fiscal year which shall be the basis for expending funds appropriated by KRS

248.510

to

248.570

. The budget and proposed research program shall be considered by the board in terms of the intent of KRS

248.510

to

248.570

.

The university is authorized to proceed to execute the budget approved by the Kentucky Tobacco Research Board and may expend funds accordingly, and, the Finance and Administration Cabinet is hereby authorized to issue warrants for this purpose upon request by the university.

Copies of the approved budget shall be filed by the board with the Legislative Research Commission and the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 255, § 8; 2002, ch. 98, § 6, effective July 15, 2002.

248.570.
Records — Quarterly financial report to board.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet and the University of Kentucky shall maintain such records as necessary to account for all receipts and expenditures credited to or charged against the tobacco research-trust fund and shall establish such rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of KRS

248.510

to

248.570

.

The University of Kentucky shall furnish to the Kentucky Tobacco Research Board and the Legislative Research Commission a quarterly financial report showing the status of funds and the status of all research projects authorized under the provisions of KRS

248.510

to

248.570

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 255, § 9; 1982, ch. 324, § 2, effective July 15, 1982.

Opinions of Attorney General.

In light of this section and KRS ch. 45, the Kentucky tobacco research board does not have the power to establish its own regulations governing the payment of travel expense vouchers and, while the board may appropriate funds for the payment of its members’ expense vouchers, any disbursements from this account must be approved by the department of finance.

OAG 72-547

.

248.580.
Kentucky Tobacco Research and Development Center — Use of certain state funds.

The Kentucky Tobacco Research and Development Center is hereby created.

The Kentucky Tobacco Research and Development Center is to be overseen by the Kentucky Tobacco Research Board and shall undertake not only research into tobacco but also other research having related or complementary interests, including but not limited to commercialization potential of tobacco and plant research, plant natural products research and research into development of new crops based on tobacco and other plants.

The Kentucky Tobacco Research and Development Center may share its physical facility with other research operations having these and similar interests, subject to approval of the Kentucky Tobacco Research Board.

State funds appropriated by the General Assembly under KRS

248.510

to

248.570

shall be used solely for research conducted by, or operations of, the Kentucky Tobacco Research and Development Center and the Kentucky Tobacco Research Board.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 98, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.

248.610.
Restriction on use of tobacco stalks — Exception.

No person shall use, and no person shall purchase or otherwise acquire for intended use, any tobacco stalks in any manner that could result in human consumption by smoking or other use of tobacco stalks. This section does not prohibit the use of tobacco stalks in new and innovative uses for tobacco.

The Department of Agriculture shall enforce this section, and shall initiate prosecution whenever and wherever it has reasonable grounds to believe this section is being violated.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 308, § 1; 1994, ch. 146, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2002, ch. 98, § 7, effective July 15, 2002.